src/fst/morphology/incoming/resplit/prevn.lexc
LEXICON BOUND
0:%< PV_COUNTER "weight: 10" ; 

LEXICON PV_COUNTER
@D.pvcount@@P.pvcount.1@ PREVERBS ;
@R.pvcount.1@@P.pvcount.2@ PREVERBS ;
@R.pvcount.2@@P.pvcount.3@ PREVERBS ;
@R.pvcount.3@@P.pvcount.4@ PREVERBS ;
@R.pvcount.4@@P.pvcount.5@ PREVERBS ;
@R.pvcount.5@@P.pvcount.6@ PREVERBS ;
!@R.count1.T@@R.count1.T@ PREVERBS ; ! no longer needed, tense moved to separate lexicon

LEXICON PREVERBS
PV/ááhkamá'p+:%^SPááhkamá'p BOUND ; ! "might"; grammar
PN/a's+:a's	BOUND ; ! "young"; variant of wa's-
PV/yaahs+:yaahs BOUND ; ! "pleasing"; variant of aahs- (is this pv or pn?)
PN/aká+:aká	BOUND ; ! "many"; variant of waaka-; short vowel like aamsskááp-
PN/aapát+:aapát	BOUND ; ! "behind, back"; initial variant of waapat
PN/naatow+:naatow	BOUND ; ! "consecrated, holy, sacred" 
PN/akkaw+:akkaw	BOUND ; ! "voluminous", w ~ y variation check phonology
PN/apoyi+:apoyi	BOUND ; ! "brown or any earth tone"
PN/i'nák+:i'nák	BOUND ; ! "small"
PV/i'tsk+:i'tsk BOUND ; ! "bare, raw"; both have verbal examples in dictionary
PN/iinohk+:iinohk	BOUND ; ! "last, at the very end"
PN/otoom+:otoom	BOUND ; ! "first"; non-initial variant of matoom-
PN/ikako+:ikako	BOUND ; ! "void, nil"
PN/ikkahs+:ikkahs	BOUND ; ! "humorous, funny, odd"
PN/ikotsk+:ikotsk	BOUND ; ! "bitter"
PN/ksikk+:ksikk	BOUND ; ! "white"; initial change
PN/iksissta'p+:i2ksissta'p	BOUND ; ! "confused, abnormal init change"
PN/iksow+:iksow	BOUND ; ! "low" variant of iksiw- phonology, relaxation?
PN/inap+:inap	BOUND ; ! "sense"; verbal example
PN/pinááp+:pi2nááp	BOUND ; ! "east"; variant innaap-; note gemination? of n?; accent differences; verbal examples
PN/ipahk+:ipahk	BOUND ; ! "bad", non-initial variant of paahk-
PN/ipahs+:i2pahs	BOUND ; ! "mushy, curdled, thickened"; phonology?
PN/paahtsi+:paahtsi	BOUND ; ! "false"; are these initial and non initial variants?
PN/ipisat+:ipisat	BOUND ; ! "amazing, out of the ordinary"; non-initial variant of pisat-
PV/poohsap+:poohsap BOUND ; ! "toward speaker"
PN/ippot+:i2ppot	BOUND ; ! "by the door"; verbal examples
PN/ipíttsik+:i2píttsik	BOUND ; ! "to the side"
PN/misam+:misam	BOUND ; ! "long time"; variant of isam-; verbal examples
PN/iss+:iss	BOUND ; ! "in front"; initial variant of yiss-; another entry as "young"?
PN/ssk+:ssk	BOUND ; ! "back"; verbal examples
PN/isspí+:isspí	BOUND ; ! "deeper in water"; no accent in dictionary
PN/istot+:istot	BOUND ; ! "similar"; verbal examples
PN/isttsik+:isttsik	BOUND ; ! "smooth, shiny, slippery"; verbal examples
PN/itsik+:itsik	BOUND ; ! "sickly, weak"
PN/matsiw+:matsiw	BOUND ; ! "high quality, pretty"
PN/kiihtsip+:kiihtsip	BOUND ; ! "of more than one colour, spotted/striped"; verbal examples
PV/máak+:%^SPi2máak BOUND ; ! "why" ! grammatical!!!!
PN/mattsi+:mattsi	BOUND ; ! "bad, crazy"
PN/mii+:mii	BOUND ; ! "hardy, hard" (related to iiyi VII?)
PN/míístap+:míístap	BOUND ; ! "away from"; verbal examples
PN/naam+:naam	BOUND ; ! "alone"; initial variant of yaam-
PN/ni'tóóhk+:ni2'tóóhk	BOUND ; ! "visible"
PV/anist+:anist BOUND ; ! (unsure what this is can't find in dictionary)
PN/náám+:i2ám	BOUND ; ! "needless(ly), useless(ly)"; verbal examples
PN/o't+:o't	BOUND ; ! "near, by speaker's location" ; verbal examples
PN/o'totam+:o'totam	BOUND ; ! "superior"
PN/ohkit+:ohkit	BOUND ; ! "top, upon"
PN/ohkon+:ohkon	BOUND ; ! "sad(ly)"; verbal examples
PN/oohsi+:oohsi	BOUND ; ! "near the wall"
PN/ohtssap+:ohtssap	BOUND ; ! "along a course/route"
PN/omat+:omat	BOUND ; ! "start/begin"; "almost"; verbal examples; initial o > a?
PN/omia'nist+:omia'nist	BOUND ; ! "various, different, miscellaneous"; verbal examples
PN/opam+:opam	BOUND ; ! "across from one side to the opposite side, over or through usually a body of water"; verbal examples; initial o > a?
PN/otam+:otam	BOUND ; ! "important, significant, central"
PN/otsistap+:otsistap	BOUND ; ! "understand, be aware" (this is a vrt not adt in dictionary?)
PN/pi'k+:pi'k	BOUND ; ! "unreal, magic"
PN/saat+:saat	BOUND ; ! "across the mountains"
PN/saikima'+:i2saikima'	BOUND ; ! "opposite"; verbal examples
PN/saip+:saip	BOUND ; ! "out"; verbal examples
PN/sata+:sata	BOUND ; ! "thin-skinned, overly sensitive, easily offended"; verbal examples
PN/si'k+:si'k	BOUND ; ! "cover" (called a vrt)
PN/sikotahko+:sikotahko	BOUND ; ! "brown"; verbal examples
PN/sitok+:sitok	BOUND ; ! "middle, center"
PN/sok+:i2sok	BOUND ; ! "good" (unsure if form and meaning are matched correctly)
PN/sopow+:i2sopow	BOUND ; ! "clear, thorough, detailed, meticulous"; w ~ y variation; verbal examples
PN/sski+:sski	BOUND ; ! "dark"
PN/sso+:i2sso	BOUND ; ! "close to the edge of"; verbal examples
PN/sstsim+:i2sstsim	BOUND ; ! "reluctant"; verbal examples
PN/waaist+:waaist	BOUND ; ! "near speaker"; dialect variant waiist-
PN/waamis+:waamis	BOUND ; ! "higher elevation, uphill"
PN/waapatohs+:waapatohs	BOUND ; ! "north"
PN/waawatt+:waawatt	BOUND ; ! "on one's own initiative, independently"
PN/yissk+:yissk	BOUND ; ! "down low"
PV/iiyik+:iiyik BOUND ; ! "strong, hard, fervent"
PV/aaksta'+:aaksta' BOUND ; ! "interrogative prefix future" grammatical, move
PV/akk+:akk BOUND ; ! "more"
PV/amo'tap+:amo'tap BOUND ; ! "all over"; variant of omo'tap-
PV/anow+:anow BOUND ; ! (believe this is same as ano-)
PV/aso+:aso BOUND ; ! "within"
PV/i'sskaan+:i2'sskaan BOUND ; ! "dangerous or risky"
PV/iiht+:iiht BOUND ; ! "source, means"; word-initial; rel root, check for other variants (if phonology choose one underlying?)
PV/omohp+:%^SPomohp BOUND ; ! "associative"; immediately after person prefixes; rel root; comitative
PV/iihtsitssitak+:iihtsitssitak BOUND ; ! "through"
PV/omaa+:omaa BOUND ; ! "yet"; non-initial variant of iimaa
PV/iinatt+:iinatt BOUND ; ! "continue VERBing when should be doing something else" (iin+matt?)
PV/iinik+:iinik BOUND ; ! "aggressively, abusively, tough"
PV/niitsskimaan+:niitsskimaan BOUND ; ! "direct, brusque, blunt"
PV/ikaiksist+:i2kaiksist BOUND ; ! "ready"
PV/ikapo+:ikapo BOUND ; ! "tuple, set of" (looks more like a suffix than a prefix? or must otherwise combine with a number?)
PV/ikihkiht+:ikihkiht BOUND ; ! "randomly, at irregular intervals, intermittently"
PV/ikippa'+:i2kippa' BOUND ; ! "feign, pretend"
PV/ikkan+:ikkan BOUND ; ! "glitter"
PV/iksisstow:iksisstow	BOUND ; ! "extravagant, waste, surplus"; w ~ y variation; newly added from dictionary
PV/ikstsina'+:kstsina' BOUND ; ! assume this is same as above, can't find in dictionary?
PV/immoyi+:immoyi BOUND ; ! "hairy, furry"; nominal examples
PV/ipahkitap+:ipahkitap BOUND ; ! "despair, forsaken"
PV/ipann+:i2pann BOUND ; ! "overnight"
PV/ipiitsiy+:%^SPi2piitsiy BOUND ; ! "begin, commence"
PV/poína+:i2poína BOUND ; ! (assuming this is the same, not in dictionary; póína/Ipoina in grammar)
PV/ippita+:ippita BOUND ; ! "aged, elderly, usually said of women"; non-initial variant of kipita-; gemination
PV/ipsstsikatt+:i2psstsikatt BOUND ; ! "frequently, constantly"
PV/isinap+:i2sinap BOUND ; ! "lopsided, aslant, unbalanced"
PV/isska'+:isska' BOUND ; ! "extremely"; initial variant of sska'-
PV/naat+:%^SPnaat BOUND ; ! "fortunately" (not given as a root for two?)
PV/istsa'+:i2stsa' BOUND ; ! "last or final time"
PV/isttssi+:i2sttssi BOUND ; ! "in the forest"
PV/iton+:iton BOUND ; ! "soon"
PV/iámoohk+:iámoohk BOUND ; ! "though expected"; see yamoohk-
PV/kan+:hkan BOUND ; ! "all"; initial variant of ohkan-
PV/ksisttoyi+:ksisttoyi BOUND ; ! "square"
PV/maak+:maak BOUND ; ! "forthcoming, planned"
PV/matsowá'p+:matsowá'p BOUND ; ! "handsome, beautiful, fine, good"; nominal examples; matsow+a'p
PV/mátt+:%^SPmátt BOUND ; ! "again, additionally"; not sure there is evidence of SP (yes there is)
PV/misst+:misst BOUND ; ! "of unknown identity"
PV/onai't+:onai't BOUND ; ! "then, given certain circumstances"
PV/noohk+:%^SPnoohk BOUND ; ! "counter-expectation, please"; earlier slot?
PV/o'kio+:o'kio BOUND ; ! "all at once, everyone at the same time"; w ~ y per dictionary
PV/ohpii+:ohpii BOUND ; ! "hurried"; w ~ y per dictionary
PV/po'kí+:po'kí BOUND ; ! "in company with"
PV/on+:on BOUND ; ! "immediate"
PV/opaksikssto+:opaksikssto BOUND ; ! "abreast"
PV/saipa'+:saipa' BOUND ; ! "outside of a certain boundary"
PV/sstahpik+:sstahpik BOUND ; ! "by choice, because of own desire"; maybe initial i2?
PV/ihtatsiki+:i2htatsiki BOUND ; ! "middle, centre, midst"; unsure if i2?
PV/waanaoyit+:waanaoyit BOUND ; ! "at a point before a destination, en route"
PV/á'+:á' BOUND ; ! "inchoative"; grammar?
